Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1444XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1444XD (6) 91
jda/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. NEW SECTION. 29D.1 Information sharing —— school
safety.
1. For purposes of this section:
a. “Covered entity” includes all of the following:
(1) A nonpublic school.
(2) A charter school established pursuant to chapter 256E.
(3) A charter school or innovation zone school established
pursuant to chapter 256F.
(4) The judicial branch.
(5) A criminal or juvenile justice agency as defined in
section 692.1.
(6) A political subdivision.
(7) A state agency.
(8) Any service or support provider that contracts with a
person described in subparagraphs (1) through (7).
b. “Nonpublic school” means the same as defined in section
280.2.
c. “Political subdivision” means a city, county, school
district, or township.
d. “School district” means a school corporation organized
under chapter 274.
e. “State agency” means a department, board, bureau,
commission, or other agency or authority of the state of Iowa.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
including section 22.7, any covered entity that provides
services to students enrolled in kindergarten through grade
twelve who are experiencing or at risk of an emotional
disturbance or mental illness, or who pose an articulable and
significant threat to the health and safety of any person, may
share records or information that are reasonably necessary to
ensure access to appropriate services for such students, or to
ensure the safety of such students or others, with any other
such covered entity.
3. A covered entity may communicate, collaborate, and
coordinate efforts with other covered entities to best serve
LSB 1444XD (6) 91
-1- jda/jh 1/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
students enrolled in kindergarten through grade twelve who are
experiencing or at risk of an emotional disturbance or mental
illness, or who pose an articulable and significant threat to
the health and safety of any person.
Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. 0d. Be subject to and comply with the
requirements of section 29D.1 relating to the sharing of
records or information, and the communication, collaboration,
and coordination of efforts to best serve students, in the same
manner as a school district.
NEW PARAGRAPH. 0t. Be subject to and comply with the
requirements of section 280.36 relating to the establishment of
a multidisciplinary threat assessment team in the same manner
as a school district.
Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. 0d. Be subject to and comply with the
requirements of section 29D.1 relating to the sharing of
records or information, and the communication, collaboration,
and coordination of efforts to best serve students, in the same
manner as a school district.
NEW PARAGRAPH. r. Be subject to and comply with the
requirements of section 280.36 relating to the establishment of
a multidisciplinary threat assessment team in the same manner
as a school district.
Sec. 4. NEW SECTION. 280.36 Multidisciplinary threat
assessment teams —— immunity.
1. The board of directors of each school district and the
authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school may
establish a multidisciplinary threat assessment team. If
established, the multidisciplinary threat assessment team shall
coordinate resources and assess and intervene when a student
enrolled in the school district or accredited nonpublic school
exhibits behavior that may pose a threat to the safety of the
LSB 1444XD (6) 91
-2- jda/jh 2/5

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
school district or accredited nonpublic school, employees of
the school district or accredited nonpublic school, or other
student enrolled in the school district or accredited nonpublic
school.
2. The multidisciplinary threat assessment team may consist
of any of the following members:
a. A local law enforcement official.
b. A representative from juvenile court services.
c. A mental health professional.
d. A social services representative.
e. A school official.
3. The board of directors of a school district or the
authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school
may enter into an agreement with another school district,
accredited nonpublic school, charter school, or innovation zone
school to create a multidisciplinary threat assessment team
that shall coordinate resources among the schools and assess
and intervene when a student enrolled in either school exhibits
behavior that may pose a threat to the safety of either school,
employees of either school, or students enrolled in either
school.
4. A multidisciplinary threat assessment team may share
records or information in accordance with section 29D.1.
5. In addition to any other immunity available, any person
who, in good faith with reasonable cause and without malice,
acts to report, investigate, or cause any investigation to
be made into the activities of a student or other person as
such report or investigation relates to conduct or information
indicating that the student or person poses a credible danger
of serious bodily injury or death to one or more students,
school employees, or others on school property shall be immune
from all civil liability that might otherwise be incurred
or imposed as the result of the making of such a report,
investigation, or disclosure.